Wyoming statutes. Title 8 General Provisions
Chapter 4 Legal Time and Holidays

§ 8-4-101.
Legal holidays; dismissal of schools.

The following days are legal holidays in and for the state of Wyoming:

New Year’s Day, January 1;

Washington’s and Lincoln’s birthdays, to be observed on the third Monday in February;

Memorial Day, to be observed on the last Monday in May;

Independence Day, July 4;

Labor Day, to be observed on the first Monday in September;

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 21, § 2.

Veterans Day, November 11;

Thanksgiving Day, to be observed on the fourth Thursday in November;

Christmas Day, December 25;

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 180, § 1.

Upon declaration by the governor of this state, any date appointed or declared by the president of the United States as an occasion of national mourning, rejoicing or observance of national emergency;

Martin Luther King, Jr., Wyoming Equality Day, to be observed on the third Monday in January.

If New Year’s Day, Independence Day, Christmas Day or Veterans Day fall upon a Sunday, the Monday following is a legal holiday.

On Washington’s and Lincoln’s birthdays, Veterans Day, Martin Luther King, Jr., Wyoming Equality Day and all days upon which general elections are held, the public schools of any district shall not be dismissed except by order of the board of trustees of the district, but proper exercises may be held in the schools on these days to emphasize their significance and importance.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 67, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1430; Laws 1888, ch. 87, § 1; 1890, ch. 80, § 182; R.S. 1899, § 2696; Laws 1901, ch. 93, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3581; C.S. 1920, § 4522; Laws 1923, ch. 6, § 1; 1925, ch. 13, § 1; 1929, ch. 4, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 53-101; C.S. 1945, § 49-101; Laws 1955, ch. 55, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 8-51; Laws 1969, ch. 119, § 1; 1971, ch. 218, § 1; 1973, ch. 12, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

8-6-101

; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1; 1983, ch. 180, § 1; 1990, ch. 21, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

As to opening day of district court in case of legal holiday, see §

5-3-104

.

As to sale of intoxicating liquor on Sunday, see §

12-5-101

.

For authority of banks to close on Saturdays, see §

13-1-301

.

As to exclusion of Sunday if last day in computation of time, see Rule 6(a), W.R.C.P.

Acts done on legal holiday other than Sunday. —

Armistice Day (now Veterans Day) is a legal holiday other than Sunday, and with the exception of matters concerning which the statute provides that the day shall be treated as Sunday, any act done on that day is as effective as if done on any other day. Sterling Lumber Co. v. Thompson, 47 Wyo. 519, 41 P.2d 264,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1935).

§ 8-4-102.
Arbor Day.

The state forester shall promote the following activities to commemorate Arbor Day, the last Monday in April:

A tree shall be planted on state grounds in a simple ceremony;

The planting of a seedling tree or some other act may be performed in an appropriate ceremony in the schools of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1888, ch. 87, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 2697; C.S. 1910, § 3582; C.S. 1920, § 4523; R.S. 1931, § 53-102; C.S. 1945, § 49-102; W.S. 1957, § 8-52; Laws 1975, ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 8-6-102; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 8-4-103.
Wyoming Day.

In recognition of the action of the Wyoming territorial governor on December 10, 1869, in approving the first law found anywhere in legislative history which extends the right of suffrage to women, December 10 of each year is designated as “Wyoming Day.” The day shall be observed in the schools, clubs and similar groups by appropriate exercises commemorating the history of the territory and state and the lives of its pioneers, and by fostering in all ways the loyalty and good citizenship of its people.

The governor, not later than December 1 of each year, shall issue a proclamation requesting the proper observance of “Wyoming Day” as outlined in subsection (a) of this section.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 98, § 1, 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 49-103, 49-104; W.S. 1957, §§ 8-53, 8-54; W.S. 1977, §§ 8-6-103, 8-6-104; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-4-104.
Nellie Tayloe Ross's birthday.

In recognition of the services to the state of Wyoming of Nellie Tayloe Ross, the first woman governor of any state in the United States, Nellie Tayloe Ross’s birthday, November 29, is designated a public holiday. The day shall be appropriately observed in the public schools of the state.

This section, however, shall not be construed to affect commercial paper, the making or execution of agreements in writing or judicial proceedings, or to authorize schools, businesses or public offices to close.

History.

Laws 1978, ch. 18, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 8-6-105; Laws 1978, ch. 37, § 1.

§ 8-4-105.
Native American Day.

In recognition of the North American Indian, the second Friday in May is designated as “Native American Day”. The day shall be appropriately observed in the public schools of the state, by state and local government and by organizations within the state.

The governor, not later than April 15 of each year, shall issue a proclamation requesting proper observance of “Native American Day”.

This section shall not affect commercial paper, the making or execution of written agreements or judicial proceedings, or authorize public schools, businesses or state and local government offices to close.

History.

Laws 1987, ch. 60, § 1; 2004, ch. 123, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a) substituted “second Friday in May” for “third Friday in September”; and in (b) substituted “April 15” for “September 1.”

§ 8-4-106.
Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day.

In recognition of the members of the armed forces who lost their lives and those who survived the attack on Pearl Harbor, territory of Hawaii on December 7, 1941, December 7 of each year is designated as “Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day”. The day shall be appropriately observed in the public schools of the state.

The governor, not later than September 1 of each year, shall issue a proclamation requesting proper observance of “Pearl Harbor Remembrance Day”.

This section shall not affect commercial paper, the making or execution of written agreements or judicial proceedings, or authorize public schools, businesses or state and local government offices to close.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 31, § 1.

§ 8-4-107.
Juneteenth holiday.

In celebration of the end of slavery in the United States proclaimed by Major General Gordon Granger on June 19, 1865 more than two and one-half (21/2) years after the Emancipation Proclamation was issued by President Abraham Lincoln, and in recognition of those who died and sacrificed to achieve the end of slavery, the Juneteenth holiday is established.

The Juneteenth holiday shall be celebrated each year with appropriate activities on the third Saturday of June.

This section shall not affect commercial paper, the making or execution of written agreements or judicial proceedings, or authorize public schools, business or state and local government offices to close.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 162, § 1.

§ 8-4-108.
Veterans Day.

In recognition of the many Wyoming citizens who have served in the armed forces of this country, November 11 of each year is designated as “Veterans Day.” The day shall be appropriately observed in the public schools of the state and by organizations within the state.

The governor, not later than November 1 of each year, shall issue a proclamation requesting proper observance of Veterans Day and requesting military and veterans’ organizations to work with the boards of all Wyoming school districts to conduct proper exercises in observation of the contributions and sacrifices of veterans.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 85, § 1.

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 85, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2004.

§ 8-4-109.
Wyoming Veterans Welcome Home Day.

In recognition of the members of the United States armed forces who served bravely and faithfully for the United States during the Vietnam War, and to all those members of the United States armed forces who were not properly thanked or welcomed home following their military service, March 30 of each year is designated as “Wyoming Veterans Welcome Home Day.” The day shall be appropriately observed in the public schools of the state and by organizations within the state. Additionally, it is recommended that Wyoming communities host “Wyoming Veterans Welcome Home Day” celebrations to ensure those members of the United States armed forces can be properly thanked and welcomed home.

The governor, not later than March 20 of each year, shall issue a proclamation requesting proper observance of Wyoming Veterans Welcome Home Day and requesting military and veterans’ organizations to work with Wyoming school districts to observe the contributions and sacrifices of Vietnam veterans and other veterans.

This section shall not affect commercial paper, the making or execution of written agreements or judicial proceedings, or authorize public schools, business or state and local government offices to close.

History.

Laws 2011, ch. 25, § 2.

Effective date. —

Laws 2011, ch. 25, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2011, ch. 25, § 1, provides:

“(a) The legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

“(i) In 2007, the United States Congress, by separate Senate and House Resolutions, declared that a Welcome Home Vietnam Veterans Day should be established;

“(ii) The Vietnam War was fought in Vietnam from 1961 to 1975, and involved North Vietnam and Viet Cong in conflict with the United States and South Vietnam;

“(iii) The United States became involved in Vietnam because policymakers in the United States believed that if South Vietnam fell to a communist government, communism would spread throughout the rest of southeast Asia;

“(iv) Members of the United States armed forces began serving in an advisory role to the South Vietnamese in 1961;

“(v) As a result of the Gulf of Tonkin incidents on August 2 and 4, 1964, the United States overwhelmingly passed the Gulf of Tonkin Resolution (Public Law 99-408), on August 7, 1964, which effectively handed over the war-making powers to President Johnson until such time as “peace and security” had returned to Vietnam;

“(vi) In 1965, there were eighty thousand (80,000) United States troops in Vietnam, and by 1969 a peak of approximately five hundred forty-three thousand (543,000) troops was reached;

“(vii) On January 27, 1973, the Treaty of Paris was signed, which required the release of all United States prisoners of war held in North Vietnam and the withdrawal of all United States armed forces from South Vietnam;

“(viii) On March 29, 1973, the United States armed forces completed the withdrawal of combat troops from Vietnam;

“(ix) More than fifty-eight thousand (58,000) members of the United States armed forces lost their lives in Vietnam and more than three hundred thousand (300,000) were wounded;

“(x) In 1982, the Vietnam Veterans Memorial was dedicated in the District of Columbia to commemorate those members of the United States armed forces who died or were declared missing in action in Vietnam;

“(xi) The Vietnam War was an extremely divisive issue among the people of the United States;

“(xii) Upon their return home, members of the United States armed forces who served bravely and faithfully for the United States during the Vietnam War were caught in the crossfire of public debate about the involvement of the United States in the war. Many of these veterans were treated with disrespect and their leaders recommended they not wear their military uniform as they returned home;

“(xiii) Additionally, many veterans returning home from previous wars or overseas duty, especially Korean War, Gulf War and Cold War veterans, were not properly welcomed home and did not receive the thanks of a grateful state and nation;

“(xiv) Our state and nation has learned the value of a simple ‘thank you’ and ‘welcome home’ as shown by the recognition and celebrations for those who are serving in the ongoing War on Terror;

“(xv) The establishment of a Wyoming Veterans Welcome Home Day to thank Vietnam and other veterans would be an appropriate way to honor those members of the United States armed forces who were not properly welcomed home following their military service.”

§ 8-4-110.
Agent Orange Health Awareness Month.

In recognition of those who have been exposed to Agent Orange and as many as five (5) future generations who may also suffer from a number of deleterious health effects associated with the toxic dioxin in Agent Orange, and in recognition that because more than nineteen million (19,000,000) gallons of herbicide was sprayed throughout South Vietnam, with Agent Orange accounting for approximately eleven million (11,000,000) gallons, causing the United States department of veterans affairs to presume that all veterans who served in Vietnam were exposed, the month of August of each year is designated as “Agent Orange Health Awareness Month.” The month may be appropriately observed in the public schools of the state and by organizations within the state. The legislature recommends that Wyoming communities host programs during Agent Orange Health Awareness Month to encourage all Vietnam veterans and their offspring who have not already done so to seek proper health screening and to educate the general population of Wyoming about the Vietnam War era, Agent Orange and the health effects of Agent Orange.

The governor, not later than July 10 of each year, shall issue a proclamation requesting proper observance of Agent Orange Health Awareness Month and requesting healthcare, military and veterans’ organizations to work with Wyoming school districts and communities to encourage health screenings and observe the month with appropriate activities and programs.

The Wyoming veterans’ commission, in conjunction with the United States department of veterans affairs, shall develop and publicize a campaign during the month of August to encourage Wyoming Vietnam veterans and their families to register with the United States department of veterans affairs Agent Orange registry health exam. The Wyoming veterans’ commission may encourage Wyoming Vietnam veterans to schedule and take the Agent Orange registry health exam. The Wyoming veterans’ commission shall also develop and publicize an outreach campaign to notify Wyoming Vietnam veterans of changes to the presumptive medical conditions associated with Agent Orange as recognized by the United States department of veterans affairs.

History.

2017 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2017, ch. 79, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2017.

§ 8-4-111.
Purple Heart Day.

In recognition of the purple heart as the oldest United States military decoration in present use, created as the badge of military merit in 1782 by General George Washington, and in recognition that the purple heart is specifically awarded to members of the United States armed forces including Wyoming citizens who have been wounded or paid the ultimate sacrifice in combat, August 7 of each year is designated as “Purple Heart Day.” The day shall be appropriately observed by state and local governments and by organizations within the state.

The Wyoming veterans’ commission shall work with military and veterans’ organizations and Wyoming communities to observe the day with appropriate activities and programs.

This section shall not affect commercial paper, the making or execution of written agreements or judicial proceedings, or authorize public schools, business or state and local government offices to close.

History.

2018 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2018, ch.
8, § 2, provides:
“In recognition of military service members including Wyoming citizens who have been wounded or killed in combat, the state of Wyoming is hereby designated as a Purple Heart state.“

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 8, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 8-4-112.
Estelle Reel Day.

In recognition of Estelle Reel, the first woman elected and to hold the office of state superintendent of public instruction in Wyoming and the second woman elected and to hold a statewide office in the United States, January 7 of each year is designated as “Estelle Reel Day.” The day shall be appropriately observed by state and local governments and may be observed in the public schools of the state and by organizations within the state.

The governor shall, in advance of January 7 of each year, issue a proclamation requesting proper observance of “Estelle Reel Day.”

This section shall not affect commercial paper, the making or execution of agreements or judicial proceedings, or authorize schools, businesses or state and local government offices to close.

History.

2018 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

This section was renumbered as

8-4-112

by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2018, ch. 51, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2018.

§ 8-4-113.
Wyoming Cowboy and Cowgirl Legacy Week.

The third calendar week of September is declared to be “Wyoming Cowboy and Cowgirl Legacy Week”.

Wyomingites are encouraged to observe Wyoming Cowboy and Cowgirl Legacy Week with appropriate ceremonies and activities.

The Wyoming department of education shall encourage schools and teachers to commemorate Wyoming Cowboy and Cowgirl Legacy Week through appropriate activities, including study of the Code of the West and cowboy and cowgirl related history and literature.

The University of Wyoming is encouraged to continue to promote and safeguard the cowboy and cowgirl as an emblematic symbol of Wyoming and instill students with knowledge of cowboy and cowgirl values.

History.

2019 ch. 154, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 154 § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 8-4-114.
Public lands day.

In tribute to the importance of public lands in the state, to acknowledge the multiple use of public lands and in recognition of the value of public lands to the state’s economy, open spaces, diversity of mineral, grazing and forestry resources, wildlife and recreational opportunities, the fourth Saturday in September of each year is designated as “public lands day” and appropriate observance may be held by the public and in all public schools of the state.

Not later than September 1 of each year, the governor is authorized to issue a proclamation requesting the proper observance of “Public Lands Day.”

This section shall not affect commercial paper, the making or execution of written agreements or judicial proceedings, or authorize public schools, business or state and local government offices to close.

As used in this section, “public lands” means all federal and state public lands. “Public lands” shall not include state trust lands managed for the benefit of Wyoming’s public schools and institutions.

History.

2019 ch. 177, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

This section was redesignated as §

8-4-114

by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 177 § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2019.

§ 8-4-115.
Mountain daylight time. [Contingently effective, see effective date note.]

The year-round observed time of the entire state of Wyoming and all of the state’s political subdivisions is mountain daylight time. Wyoming exempts all areas of the state from mountain standard time.

As used in this section:

“Mountain daylight time” means the period during a year when mountain standard time is advanced one (1) hour in accordance with 15 U.S.C. § 260a;

“Mountain standard time” means the observed time assigned to the mountain time zone in 15 U.S.C. § 261.

History.

2020 ch. 134, § 1, effective March 24, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 134, § 2, provides: “(a) This act is effective on the first Sunday of November following the day on which both of the following have occurred:

“(i) Legislation enacted by the United States congress goes into effect to amend
15 U.S.C. § 260a to authorize states to observe daylight saving time year-round; and

“(ii) Not fewer than four (4) western states, including Wyoming, pass legislation to place all or a portion of those states on year-round daylight time, regardless of the time zone.

“(b) The governor shall inform the management council of the legislature in writing of the date this bill takes effect in accordance with this section.“(c) As used in this section, ‘western states’ means the states of Colorado, Idaho, Montana, Nebraska, North Dakota, South Dakota, Utah and Wyoming.”